runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
ангеля/Sy
апробування/TU
бабаченя/Sy
багатшання/T
барилко/TV
барсеня/Sy
басище/X1
білувати/Z|wO
благодіяння/TU
блазеня/S
боргування/T
Борелів/S
бризкальце/TV
булів/S
буяти/[|Q
ввезення/TU
вдавити/ZMO
ведмежа/Sy
веретінце/TV
взаємоврівноваження/T
взивати/[|Q(
вивітрити/ZMO
вивчення/TU
видавити/ZMO
викруглятися/[|Q
вимести/ZN
вимісити/ZOM
вимокання/TU
вимолоти/^N
вимолювання/T
винадити/ZOL
виплести/ZN
вискалятися/[|Q
висмолити/ZOM
високогір'я/TV
вистрибайло/TuU2d
виторочити/ZOM
віброущільнення/TU
відвістити/ZM
відгоряти/[|Q
віддзеркалювання/TU
відкинути/ZOn
відмести/ZN
відплести/ZN
відрізнитися/ZM
відряджатися/[|Q
відсторонити/ZMO
відтягнення/TU
відштамповування/TU
вірля/Sy
вістря/TV
вкоренити/ZMN
вкотитися/ZM
вмилостивляти/[|Q
вогнисько/TU
водноманітнити/ZO
вороненя/Sy
вплести/ZN
врівнювання/TU
всолодити/ZM
встромляти/[|Q
вторгнення/TU
вугренятко/TVu
гаденя/Sy
гальванізувати/Z|wO
гіпсовипалювання/TU
глісування/T
глядачів/S
голоситися/ZM|w
голосище/TUX
голуб'ятко/TVu
гострішати/[|Q
гуцуля/Sy
двоборство/TU
делегувати/Z|wO
деревце/TV
держвидання/TU
дияволя/Sy
дівчатко/TVu
дівчинище/TuU
дно/TW
доголосувати/ZO
доїдати/[|Q
долучити/ZMO
домести/ZN
домище/TUX
домолоти/^nN
допалювання/T
доплести/ZN
доуявити/ZO
дочувати/[|Q
дренування/TU
дуття/TV
євангеліє/TU
жайворонча/Sy
житло/TV
з'явитися/ZM
забронзувати/ZO
заготовлятися/[|Q
загублення/T
задранкувати/ZO
задрижати/ZM
зазублення/TU
заклинаннячко/TV
закумулювати/ZO
залучити/ZMO
замести/ZN
занапащатися/[|Q
заохочення/TU
запечалити/ZLO
заплести/ZN
заповісти/_N
заручитися/ZM
засмітити/ZMO
засягати/[|Q
затрубити/ZMO
затягання/TU
захеджувати/ZO
захмарення/TU
звалкувати/ZO
зведеня/Sy
згаситися/ZM
згортатися/[|Q
здуття/TV
зерносортування/T
зіщулити/ZLO
змести/ZN
змивання/TU
змолоти/^Nn
знищити/ZLO9
зносити/Z|wLMO
зривати/[|Q(
ідентифікування/T
іменнячко/TV
індича/Sy
кастрування/TU
кількадесят/S
кіновідкриття/TV
кінознімання/T
кожушище/TUX
коліщатко/TV
консолідувати/Z|wO
кошеня/Sy
кривдження/T
кривлятися/[|Q
кривосвідчити/Z|wM
крилечко/TV
крутобережжя/TU
кубло/TV
кухарча/Sy
лисиченя/Sy
лобурисько/TuUV2d
лютеранство/T
маратонище/X
марафонище/X
масло/TV
мести/Z|wN
мигати/[|Q
мікродзеркало/TU
мікроядро/TV
Міненерговугілля/T
молоти/^|Nn
мопсеня/Sy
навалити/ZMO
наддоїти/ZO
надолужати/[|Q
надплести/ZN
накладання/TU
наколотитися/ZM
намести/ZN
намолоти/^nN
нановолокно/TV
наплести/ZN
напровадження/TU
напускатися/[|Q
нафарширувати/ZO
нахолодитися/ZM
невиконування/T
недоплести/ZN
нетерів/S
нечорнозем'я/TV
нив'я/TV
нокати/[|Q
обжирайло/TuU2d
облавок/4bfP
обмести/ZNO
обмолоти/^Nn
обплести/ZN
обряджати/[|Q
обсмолити/ZOM
обчислити/ZMO
обшліфовування/T
опікати/[|Q
оплести/ZN
орля/Sy
осереддя/TU
охудожнення/T
паненятко/TVu
паруб'я/Sy
перебронювати/ZO
перебудити/ZOM
перевикати/[|Q
перезаливання/T
перекриття/TUV
перемовляти/[|Q
перемолоти/^nN
перепалити/ZMO
переплюндрувати/ZO
перетискання/T
перетлівати/[|Q
писарів/S
питаннячко/TV
півстоліття/TU
підкрасити/ZOM
підмести/ZN
підпирати/[|Q(
підплести/ZN
підпоювання/T
підрегулювати/ZO
плічко/TV
поборювання/TU
повчати/[|Q
погасити/ZMO
поменшити/ZMO
помолоти/^Nn
попоговорити/ZM
потоншення/TU
потрактовування/T
православ'я/TV
привчити/ZMO
пригамувати/ZO
призабуватися/[|Q
приплести/ZN
притлумитися/ZM
пробуксовування/TU
продавити/ZMO
пролягати/[|Q
проплатитися/ZM
проплести/ZN
просівання/TU
пряжити/Z|wO
раченя/Sy
реакторобудування/TU
рибенятко/TVu
розділити/ZMO
розкуття/T
розлютити/ZMO
розмерзатися/[|Q
розмолоти/^nN
розсадження/TU
розточити/ZMO
самопояснення/T
свинцювання/TU
серненя/Sy
серненятко/TVu
скоїти/ZLO
скрадатися/[|Q
сов'ятко/TVu
совеня/Sy
співпричастя/TU
співчування/TU
сплести/ZN
сповіститися/ZM
стовпище/TUX
стриженя/Sy
сузір'я/TV
схрестити/ZMO
тегування/TU
теплішати/[|Q
тигриня/Sy
томище/X1
тонування/T
туманище/TUX
тхореня/Sy
тютюнище/TUX
ублажити/ZM
узгір'ячко/TV
уміння/TU
уплести/ZN
урихтувати/ZO
уробляти/[|Q
усочитися/ZM
фотоаматорство/T
хвостище/TUX
хлопча/Sy
хлопчище/X1
цапище/TU
цісарів/S
чавунище/TUX
чапленятко/TVu
чемоданище/X1
чіткішати/[|Q
чортище/X1
чубище/TUX
шахтарча/Sy
шрамище/X
штормище/X
щеня/Sy
янгелятко/TVu
